Ohio, session 136, HB580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.857 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.857. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northeastbound and southwestbound lanes of state route number forty-seven between Simon road and state route number sixty-six, in Shelby county, shall be known as the "PFC Francis Guillozet Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.